District of Columbia statutes.
26-710

Applicability.

(a)

Except as expressly provided, the following laws shall not apply to national banks organized pursuant to 12 U.S.C. §§ 21 to 95, members of Federal Home Loan Banks as defined in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1422 to 1424, and Federal Credit Unions as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1752, but shall apply to all banks, savings companies, trust companies, related holding companies, or other banking institutions in the District of Columbia:

(1)

Sections 26-101, 26-102, 26-1301 through 26-1352, and 26-201 through 26-232;

(2)

Sections 26-901 through 26-912;

(3)

Section 26-103;

(4)

Sections 26-801 and 26-802;

(5)

Sections 26-104, 26-107, 26-108 [repealed], and 26-109;

(6)

Sections 26-105 and 26-106;

(7)

Sections 26-110, 26-803, and 26-804;

(8)

Chapter 4 of this title;

(9)

Section 26-251; and

(10)

Sections 26-501 through 26-504.

(b)

The Superintendent [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] shall not have the power to regulate the authority or activities of a bank holding company or bank in a manner which, directly or indirectly, cause it to operate its national banking subsidiary in a manner which violates federal requirements.

History

Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 10a
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(j), 33 DCR 1168

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-809.1.